Virginia statutes. Title 17.1. Courts of Record.
Chapter 4. The Court of Appeals.

§ 17.1-400.
Creation and organization; election and terms of judges; oath; vacancies; qualifications; incompatible activities prohibited; chief judge.

The Court of Appeals of Virginia is hereby established effective January 1, 1985. It shall consist of 17 judges who shall be elected for terms of eight years by the majority of the members elected to each house of the General Assembly. The General Assembly shall consider regional diversity in making its elections. Before entering upon the duties of the office, a judge of the Court of Appeals shall take the oath of office required by law. The oath shall be taken before a justice of the Supreme Court of Virginia or before any officer authorized by law to administer an oath. When any vacancy exists while the General Assembly is not in session, the Governor may appoint a successor to serve until 30 days after the commencement of the next regular session of the General Assembly. Whenever a vacancy occurs or exists in the office of a judge of the Court of Appeals while the General Assembly is in session, or when the term of office of a judge of the Court of Appeals will expire or the office will be vacant or vacated at a date certain between the adjournment of the General Assembly and the commencement of the next session of the General Assembly, a successor may be elected at any time during a session preceding the date of such vacancy by the vote of a majority of the members elected to each house of the General Assembly for a full term and, upon qualification, the successor shall enter at once upon the discharge of the duties of the office; however, such successor shall not qualify prior to the predecessor leaving office. No person shall be elected or reelected to a subsequent term under this section until he has submitted to a criminal history record search and submitted to a search of the central registry maintained pursuant to §

63.2-1515

for any founded complaint of child abuse or neglect and reports of such searches have been received by the chairmen of the House Committee for Courts of Justice and the Senate Committee on the Judiciary. If the person has not met the requirement of filing in the preceding calendar year a disclosure form prescribed in §

2.2-3117

or 30-111, he shall also provide a written statement of economic interests on the disclosure form prescribed in §

2.2-3117

to the chairmen of the House Committee for Courts of Justice and the Senate Committee on the Judiciary.All judges of the Court of Appeals shall be residents of the Commonwealth and shall, at least five years prior to the appointment or election, have been licensed to practice law in the Commonwealth. No judge of the Court of Appeals, during his continuance in office, shall engage in the practice of law within or without the Commonwealth or seek or accept any nonjudicial elective office, or hold any other office of public trust, or engage in any other incompatible activity.

The chief judge shall be elected by majority vote of the judges of the Court of Appeals to serve a term of four years.

If a judge of the Court of Appeals is absent or unable through sickness, disability, or any other reason to perform or discharge any official duty or function authorized or required by law, a (i) retired chief justice or retired justice of the Supreme Court of Virginia, (ii) retired chief judge or retired judge of the Court of Appeals of Virginia, or (iii) retired judge of a circuit court of Virginia, with his or her prior consent, may be appointed by the chief judge of the Court of Appeals, acting upon his own initiative or upon a personal request from the absent or disabled judge, to perform or discharge the official duties or functions of the absent or disabled judge until that judge shall again be able to attend his duties. The chief judge of the Court of Appeals shall be notified forthwith at the time any absent or disabled judge is able to return to his duties.

The chief judge of the Court of Appeals may, upon his own initiative, designate a (i) retired chief justice or retired justice of the Supreme Court of Virginia, (ii) retired chief judge or retired judge of the Court of Appeals of Virginia, or (iii) retired or active judge of a circuit court of Virginia, with the prior consent of such justice or judge, to perform or discharge the official duties or functions of a judge of the Court of Appeals if there is a need to do so due to congestion in the work of the court. Nothing in this subsection shall be construed to increase the number of judges of the Court of Appeals provided for in subsection A of this section.

Any retired chief justice, retired justice, retired chief judge or active or retired judge sitting on the Court of Appeals pursuant to subsection C or D shall receive from the state treasury actual expenses for the time he or she is actually engaged in holding court.

The powers and duties herein conferred or empowered upon the chief judge of the Court of Appeals may be exercised and performed by any judge or any committee of judges of the court designated by the chief judge for such purpose.

History.

1983, c. 413, § 17-116.01; 1984, c. 701; 1987, c. 88; 1991, cc. 31, 442; 1998, c. 872; 2000, c. 8; 2004, c. 452; 2018, c. 578; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 489.

Editor’s note.

The Virginia Code Commission authorized the substitution of “House Committee for Courts of Justice and the Senate Committee on the Judiciary” for “House and Senate Committees for Courts of Justice” twice in subsection A. March 10, 2021.

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 489, cl. 3 provides: “That any case for which a notice of appeal to the Supreme Court has been filed prior to January 1, 2022, shall continue in the Supreme Court of Virginia and shall not be affected by the provisions of this act.”

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 489, cl. 4 provides: “That any case for which a petition for appeal in a criminal case to the Court of Appeals has been filed prior to January 1, 2022, and a decision on such petition remains pending, such petition for appeal shall be deemed granted and the clerk of the Court of Appeals shall certify the granting of such petition to the trial court and all counsel. Such case shall be considered mature for purposes of further proceedings from the date of such certificate.”

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 489, cl. 5 provides: “That the Office of the Executive Secretary of the Supreme Court of Virginia shall report to the House Committee for Courts of Justice and the Senate Committee on the Judiciary detailing the expanded workload of the Court of Appeals of Virginia pursuant to the first enactment of this act each year following the enactment of the first enactment clause of this act for three years by January 1 of such year. The first such report shall be made by January 1, 2023.”

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 489, cl. 6 provides: “That the provisions of this act amending §

17.1-400

of the Code of Virginia shall become effective in due course and that the remaining provisions of this act shall become effective on January 1, 2022.”

The 2000 amendments.

The 2000 amendment by c. 8 increased the number of judges on the Court of Appeals of Virginia from ten to eleven in the second sentence of subsection A.

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendment by c. 452 added the last sentence in the first paragraph of subsection A and made minor stylistic changes.

The 2018 amendments.

The 2018 amendment by c. 578, in the first paragraph in subsection A, substituted “and submitted to a search of the central registry maintained pursuant to §

63.2-1515

for any founded complaint of child abuse or neglect and reports of such searches have been received” for “and a report of such search has been received” in the seventh sentence, and added the last sentence.

The 2021 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2021 amendment by Sp. Sess. I, c. 489, effective July 1, 2021, in subsection A in the first paragraph, substituted “17” for “11” and inserted the third sentence.

Law Review.

For 1985 survey of Virginia civil procedure and practice, see 19 U. Rich. L. Rev. (1985).

For article, “The Subject Matter Jurisdiction of Virginia Courts in Divorce and Equitable Distribution Proceedings,” see 11 G.M.U. L. Rev. 73 (1989).

For an article, “Racial Diversity on the Bench:
Beyond Role Models and Public Confidence,” see 57 Wash. & Lee L. Rev. 405 (2000).

For essay, “The Court of Appeals of Virginia Celebrates Thirty Years of Service to the Commonwealth,” see 50 U. Rich. L. Rev. 217 (2015).

Research References.

Friend’s Virginia Pleading and Practice (Matthew Bender). Chapter 1. Courts. § 1.03. Court of Appeals. Friend.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

1B M.J. Appeal and Error, §§ 1, 20.1, 11A M.J. Judges, § 5.

§ 17.1-401.
Senior judge.

Any chief judge or judge of the Court of Appeals who is eligible for retirement, other than for disability, with the consent of a majority of the members of the court first obtained, may elect to retire under the Judicial Retirement System (§

51.1-300

et seq.) and be known and designated as a senior judge. In addition, any chief judge or judge of the Court of Appeals who is retired under the Judicial Retirement System (§

51.1-300

et seq.) shall be subject to recall, with the consent of a majority of the members of the court, and may be known and designated as a senior judge.

Any chief judge or judge who has retired from active service, as provided in subsection A, may be designated and assigned by the Chief Judge of the Court of Appeals to perform the duties of a judge of the court. Such judge shall have all the powers, duties, and privileges attendant on the position for which he is recalled to serve.

While serving in such status, a senior judge shall be deemed to be serving in a temporary capacity and, in addition to the retirement benefits received by such judge, shall receive as compensation a sum equal to one-fourth of the total compensation of an active judge of the Court of Appeals for a similar period of service. A retired judge, while performing the duties of a senior judge, shall be furnished office space, support staff, a telephone, and supplies as are furnished a judge of the court.

A judge may terminate his status as a senior judge, or such status may be terminated by a majority of the members of the court. Each judge designated a senior judge shall serve a one-year term unless the court, by order or otherwise, extends the term for an additional year. There shall be no limit on the number of terms a senior judge may so serve.

Only seven retired judges shall serve as senior judges at any one time.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to increase the number of judges of the Court of Appeals provided for in §

17.1-400

.

History.

1993, c. 421, § 17-116.01:1; 1994, c. 401; 1998, cc. 190, 872; 2001, c. 295; 2004, c. 346; 2014, c. 776; 2018, c. 709; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 489.

Editor’s note.

Acts
2018, c. 709, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective on July 1, 2019.”

Acts
2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 489, cl. 3 provides: “That any case for which a notice of appeal to the Supreme Court has been filed prior to January 1, 2022, shall continue in the Supreme Court of Virginia and shall not be affected by the provisions of this act.”

Acts
2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 489, cl. 4 provides: “That any case for which a petition for appeal in a criminal case to the Court of Appeals has been filed prior to January 1, 2022, and a decision on such petition remains pending, such petition for appeal shall be deemed granted and the clerk of the Court of Appeals shall certify the granting of such petition to the trial court and all counsel. Such case shall be considered mature for purposes of further proceedings from the date of such certificate.”

Acts
2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 489, cl. 6 provides: “That the provisions of this act amending
§

17.1-400

of the Code of Virginia shall become effective in due course and that the remaining provisions of this act shall become effective on January 1, 2022.”

The 2001 amendments.

The 2001 amendment by c. 295 substituted “support staff” for “a secretary” in subsection C.

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendment by c. 346 added the last sentence in subsection A.

The 2014 amendments.

The 2014 amendment by c. 776, effective April 23, 2014, in subsection A inserted “under the Judicial Retirement System (§

51.1-300

et seq.)” twice.

The 2018 amendments.

The 2018 amendment by c. 709, effective July 1, 2019, in subsection A, substituted “shall be subject to recall, with” for “and subject to recall pursuant §

17.1-106

, with”; and in subsection B, added the second sentence.

The 2021 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2021 amendment by Sp. Sess. I, c. 489, effective January 1, 2022, substituted “seven” for “five” in subsection E.

§ 17.1-402.
Sessions; panels; quorum; presiding judges; hearings en banc.

The Court of Appeals shall sit at such locations within the Commonwealth as the chief judge, upon consultation with the other judges of the court, shall designate so as to provide, insofar as feasible, convenient access to the various geographic areas of the Commonwealth. The chief judge shall schedule sessions of the court as required to discharge expeditiously the business of the court.

The Court of Appeals shall sit in panels of at least three judges each. The presence of all judges in the panel shall be necessary to constitute a quorum. The chief judge shall assign the members to panels and, insofar as practicable, rotate the membership of the panels. The chief judge shall preside over any panel of which he is a member and shall designate the presiding judges of the other panels.

Each panel shall hear and determine, independently of the others, the petitions for appeal pursuant to §

17.1-406

or

19.2-398

and appeals in criminal and civil cases assigned to that panel.

The Court of Appeals shall sit en banc (i) when there is a dissent in the panel to which the case was originally assigned and an aggrieved party requests an en banc hearing and at least six judges of the court vote in favor of such a hearing or (ii) when any judge of any panel shall certify that in his opinion a decision of such panel of the court is in conflict with a prior decision of the court or of any panel thereof and five other judges of the court concur in that view. The court may sit en banc upon its own motion at any time or upon the petition of any party, in any case in which a majority of the court determines it is appropriate to do so. The court sitting en banc shall consider and decide the case and may overrule any previous decision by any panel or of the full court.

The court may sit en banc with no fewer than 13 judges. In all cases decided by the court en banc, the concurrence of at least a majority of the judges sitting shall be required to reverse a judgment, in whole or in part.

History.

1983, c. 413, § 17-116.02; 1984, c. 701; 1988, cc. 71, 478; 1998, c. 872; 2000, c. 8; 2001, c. 555; 2008, cc. 54, 156; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 489.

Editor’s note.

Acts
2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 489, cl. 3 provides: “That any case for which a notice of appeal to the Supreme Court has been filed prior to January 1, 2022, shall continue in the Supreme Court of Virginia and shall not be affected by the provisions of this act.”

Acts
2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 489, cl. 4 provides: “That any case for which a petition for appeal in a criminal case to the Court of Appeals has been filed prior to January 1, 2022, and a decision on such petition remains pending, such petition for appeal shall be deemed granted and the clerk of the Court of Appeals shall certify the granting of such petition to the trial court and all counsel. Such case shall be considered mature for purposes of further proceedings from the date of such certificate.”

Acts
2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 489, cl. 6 provides: “That the provisions of this act amending
§

17.1-400

of the Code of Virginia shall become effective in due course and that the remaining provisions of this act shall become effective on January 1, 2022.”

The 2000 amendments.

The 2000 amendment by c. 8 rewrote the first sentence in subsection E, which formerly read: “The court may sit en banc with fewer than ten but not fewer than eight judges.”

The 2001 amendments.

The 2001 amendment by c. 555, in subsection D, substituted “three other judges” for “two other judges” in two places.

The 2008 amendments.

The 2008 amendments by cc. 54 and 156 are identical, and substituted “four judges” for “three other judges” in clause (i) of subsection D.

The 2021 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2021 amendment by Sp. Sess. I, c. 489, effective January 1, 2022, substituted “pursuant to §

17.1-406

or

19.2-398

and appeals in criminal and civil cases” for “and appeals granted in criminal cases and the other cases” in subsection C; in subsection D, substituted “six” for “four” and “five” for “three and inserted ”or upon the petition of any party“; and substituted ”13“ for ”eight“ in subsection E.

Law Review.

For annual survey article, see “Criminal Law and Procedure,” 48 U. Rich. L. Rev. 63 (2013).

For essay, “The Court of Appeals of Virginia Celebrates Thirty Years of Service to the Commonwealth,” see 50 U. Rich. L. Rev. 217 (2015).

§ 17.1-403.
Rules of practice, procedure, and internal processes; promulgation by Supreme Court; amendments; summary disposition of appeals.

The Supreme Court shall prescribe and publish the initial rules governing practice, procedure, and internal processes for the Court of Appeals designed to achieve the just, speedy, and inexpensive disposition of all litigation in that court consistent with the ends of justice and to maintain uniformity in the law of the Commonwealth. Before amending the rules thereafter, the Supreme Court shall receive and consider recommendations from the Court of Appeals. The rules shall prescribe procedures (i) authorizing the Court of Appeals to prescribe truncated record or appendix preparation and (ii) permitting the Court of Appeals to dispense with oral argument if the parties agree that oral argument is not necessary or if the panel has examined the briefs and record and unanimously agrees that oral argument is unnecessary because (a) the appeal is wholly without merit or (b) the dispositive issue or issues have been authoritatively decided, and the appellant has not argued that the case law should be overturned, extended, modified, or reversed.

History.

1983, c. 413, § 17-116.03; 1984, cc. 632, 701; 1998, c. 872; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 489; 2022, c. 714.

Editor’s note.

Acts
2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 489, cl. 3 provides: “That any case for which a notice of appeal to the Supreme Court has been filed prior to January 1, 2022, shall continue in the Supreme Court of Virginia and shall not be affected by the provisions of this act.”

Acts
2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 489, cl. 4 provides: “That any case for which a petition for appeal in a criminal case to the Court of Appeals has been filed prior to January 1, 2022, and a decision on such petition remains pending, such petition for appeal shall be deemed granted and the clerk of the Court of Appeals shall certify the granting of such petition to the trial court and all counsel. Such case shall be considered mature for purposes of further proceedings from the date of such certificate.”

Acts
2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 489, cl. 6 provides: “That the provisions of this act amending
§

17.1-400

of the Code of Virginia shall become effective in due course and that the remaining provisions of this act shall become effective on January 1, 2022.”

The 2021 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2021 amendment by Sp. Sess. I, c. 489, effective January 1, 2022, substituted “(i) authorizing the Court of Appeals to prescribe truncated record or appendix preparation and (ii) permitting the Court of Appeals to dispense with oral argument if the panel has examined the briefs and record and unanimously agrees that oral argument is unnecessary because (a) the appeal is wholly without merit or (b) the dispositive issue or issues have been authoritatively decided, and the appellant has not argued that the case law should be overturned, extended, modified, or reversed” for “governing the summary disposition of appeals which are determined to be without merit.”

Cross references.

As to the rules of practice of the Court of Appeals, see Part 5A, Rules of the Virginia Supreme Court, Volume 11, Code of Virginia.

Law Review.

For 1985 survey of Virginia civil procedure and practice, see 19 U. Rich. L. Rev. (1985).

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

11A M.J. Judgments & Decrees, § 119.

The 2022 amendments.

The 2022 amendment by c. 714, effective April 27, 2022, inserted “if the parties agree that oral argument is not necessary or” in clause (ii).

§ 17.1-404.
Original jurisdiction in matters of contempt and injunctions, writs of mandamus, prohibition and habeas corpus.

The Court of Appeals shall have authority to punish for contempt. In addition, in such cases over which the court would have appellate jurisdiction, the court shall have original jurisdiction to issue writs of mandamus, prohibition and habeas corpus.

History.

1983, c. 413, § 17-116.04; 1984, c. 701; 1998, c. 872; 2022, c. 307.

Editor's note.

Acts 2022, c. 307, cl. 2 provides: “That any case affected by the provisions of this act for which a petition for review to the Court of Appeals of Virginia has been filed prior to July 1, 2022, shall continue in the Court of Appeals of Virginia and, if further review is sought, in the Supreme Court of Virginia, and shall not be affected by the provisions of this act.”

The 2022 amendments.

The 2022 amendment by c. 307 deleted the former second sentence, which read: “A judge of the Court of Appeals shall exercise initially the authority concerning injunctions vested in a justice of the Supreme Court by §

8.01-626

in any case over which the court would have appellate jurisdiction as provided in §§

17.1-405

and

17.1-406

.”

Law Review.

For 1985 survey of Virginia civil procedure and practice, see 19 U. Rich. L. Rev. (1985).

Research References.

Virginia Forms (Matthew Bender). No. 6-1201. Petition for Writ of Mandamus Against Officer of a Corporation, et seq.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

1B M.J. Appeal and Error, § 20.1; 5A M.J. Courts, § 36.1.

§ 17.1-405.
Appellate jurisdiction — Administrative agency, Virginia Workers’ Compensation Commission, and civil matter appeals.

Unless otherwise provided by law, any aggrieved party may appeal to the Court of Appeals from:

Any final decision of a circuit court on appeal from (i) a decision of an administrative agency, or (ii) a grievance hearing decision issued pursuant to §

2.2-3005

;

Any final decision of the Virginia Workers’ Compensation Commission;

Except as provided in subsection B of §

17.1-406

, any final judgment, order, or decree of a circuit court in a civil matter;

Any interlocutory decree or order pursuant to §

8.01-267.8

;

Any interlocutory decree or order involving an equitable claim in which the decree or order (i) requires money to be paid or the possession or title of property to be changed or (ii) adjudicates the principles of a cause; or

Any final judgment, order, or decree of a circuit court (i) involving an application for a concealed weapons permit pursuant to Article 6.1 (§

18.2-307.1

et seq.) of Chapter 7 of Title 18.2, (ii) involving involuntary treatment of prisoners pursuant to §

53.1-40.1

or

53.1-133.04

, or (iii) for declaratory or injunctive relief under §

57-2.02

.

History.

1983, c. 413, § 17-116.05; 1984, c. 701; 1985, c. 283; 1990, c. 897; 1998, c. 872; 2000, cc. 830, 947, 1006; 2001, cc. 393, 420; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 489; 2022, cc. 307, 714.

Editor’s note.

Acts
2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 489, cl. 3 provides: “That any case for which a notice of appeal to the Supreme Court has been filed prior to January 1, 2022, shall continue in the Supreme Court of Virginia and shall not be affected by the provisions of this act.”

Acts
2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 489, cl. 4 provides: “That any case for which a petition for appeal in a criminal case to the Court of Appeals has been filed prior to January 1, 2022, and a decision on such petition remains pending, such petition for appeal shall be deemed granted and the clerk of the Court of Appeals shall certify the granting of such petition to the trial court and all counsel. Such case shall be considered mature for purposes of further proceedings from the date of such certificate.”

Acts
2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 489, cl. 6 provides: “That the provisions of this act amending
§

17.1-400

of the Code of Virginia shall become effective in due course and that the remaining provisions of this act shall become effective on January 1, 2022.”

Acts 2022, c. 307, cl. 2 provides: “That any case affected by the provisions of this act for which a petition for review to the Court of Appeals of Virginia has been filed prior to July 1, 2022, shall continue in the Court of Appeals of Virginia and, if further review is sought, in the Supreme Court of Virginia, and shall not be affected by the provisions of this act.”

The 2000 amendments.

The 2000 amendment by c. 830 substituted “Chapter 10.2 (§ 63.1-219.7 et seq.)” for “Chapter 11 (§ 63.1-220 et seq.)” in subdivision 3 g.

The 2000 amendments by cc. 947 and 1006 are identical, and added “(i)” and “or (ii) a grievance hearing decision issued pursuant to § 2.1-116.07” in subdivision 1.

The 2001 amendments.

The 2001 amendments by cc. 393 and 420 are identical, and deleted “or” at the end of subdivision 3 f, added “or” at the end of subdivision 3 g, and added subdivision 3 h.

The 2021 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2021 amendment by Sp. Sess. I, c. 489, effective January 1, 2022, added “Unless otherwise provided by law” in the introductory language of the section; rewrote subdivisions 3 and 4; added subdivision 5; and made a stylistic change.

The 2022 amendments.

The 2022 amendment by c. 714, effective April 27, 2022, redesignated former subdivision 5 as subdivision 6; added subdivision 5; and made stylistic changes.

The 2022 amendment by c. 307 deleted “8.01-626, or

8.01-675.5

” in subdivision 4 following “§

8.01-267.8

”; and made a stylistic change.

Cross references.

As to certain cases over which the Supreme Court has jurisdiction, see §

8.01-670

A.

As to appellate jurisdiction of the Court of Appeals over any order of a circuit court, magistrate, or other judicial officer which denies bail, requires excessive bail, or fixes unreasonable terms of recognizance, see §§

19.2-124

and

19.2-319

.

As to appellate jurisdiction
of the Court of Appeals over any judgment of a circuit court for civil or criminal contempt, see §

19.2-318

.

As to appellate jurisdiction of the Court of Appeals over any order of a circuit court involving involuntary treatment of prisoner, see §

53.1-40.1

.

Law Review.

For 1985 survey of Virginia civil procedure and practice, see 19 U. Rich. L. Rev. (1985).

For article, “The Subject Matter Jurisdiction of Virginia Courts in Divorce and Equitable Distribution Proceedings,” see 11 G.M.U. L. Rev. 73 (1989).

For survey on legal issues involving children in Virginia for 1989, see 23 U. Rich. L. Rev. 705 (1989).

For an article, “Final and Interlocutory Appeals in Virginia,” see 8 Geo. Mason L. Rev. 337 (1999).

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

1B Appeal and Error, §§ 20.1, 68, 72, 73, 78; 5A M.J. Courts, §§ 13, 36.1; 6A M.J. Discovery, § 2; 6A M.J. Divorce and Alimony, §§ 49, 68; 6B M.J. Drugs & Druggists, § 5; 8A M.J. Executors & Administrators, § 256; 9A M.J. Habeas Corpus, § 8; 10A M.J. Injunctions, § 72; 12B M.J. Mandamus, § 24; 15 M.J. Public Officers, § 46.

§ 17.1-406.
Appeals in criminal matters; cases over which Court of Appeals does not have jurisdiction.

Any aggrieved party may appeal to the Court of Appeals from any final conviction in a circuit court of a traffic infraction or a crime. The Commonwealth or any county, city, or town may petition the Court of Appeals for an appeal pursuant to this subsection in any case in which such party previously could have petitioned the Supreme Court for a writ of error under §

19.2-317

. The Commonwealth may also petition the Court of Appeals for an appeal in a criminal case pursuant to §

19.2-398

.

In accordance with other applicable provisions of law, appeals lie directly to the Supreme Court from a final decision, judgment or order of a circuit court involving a petition for a writ of habeas corpus, from any final finding, decision, order, or judgment of the State Corporation Commission, and from proceedings under §§

54.1-3935

and

54.1-3937

. Complaints of the Judicial Inquiry and Review Commission shall be filed with the Supreme Court of Virginia. The Court of Appeals shall not have jurisdiction over any cases or proceedings described in this subsection.

History.

1984, c. 701, § 17-116.05:1; 1985, c. 371; 1987, cc. 707, 710; 1988, c. 873; 1998, c. 872; 2007, c. 889; 2013, c. 746; 2019, c. 809; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, cc. 344, 345, 489.

Editor’s note.

Acts
2021, Sp. Sess. I, cc. 344 and
345, cl. 3 provides: “That any person under a sentence of death imposed for an offense committed prior to July 1, 2021, but who has not been executed by July 1, 2021, shall have his sentence changed to life imprisonment, and such person who was 18 years of age or older at the time of the offense shall not be eligible for (i) parole, (ii) any good conduct allowance or any earned sentence credits under Chapter 6 ( §

53.1-186

et seq.) of Title 53.1 of the Code of Virginia, or (iii) conditional release pursuant to
§

53.1-40.01

or

53.1-40.02

of the Code of Virginia.”

Acts
2021, Sp. Sess. I, cc. 344 and
345, cl. 4 provides: “That notwithstanding any other provision of law, no person may be sentenced to death or put to death on or after the effective date of this act [July 1, 2021] for any violation of law.”

Acts
2021, Sp. Sess. I, cc. 344 and
345, cl. 5 provides: “That the provisions of this act may result in a net increase in periods of imprisonment or commitment. Pursuant to
§ 30-19.1:4 of the Code of Virginia, the estimated amount of the necessary appropriation is $77,376 for periods of imprisonment in state adult correctional facilities and $0 for periods of commitment to the custody of the Department of Juvenile Justice.”

Acts
2013, c. 746, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act are declaratory of existing law.”

Acts
2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 489, cl. 3 provides: “That any case for which a notice of appeal to the Supreme Court has been filed prior to January 1, 2022, shall continue in the Supreme Court of Virginia and shall not be affected by the provisions of this act.”

Acts
2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 489, cl. 4 provides: “That any case for which a petition for appeal in a criminal case to the Court of Appeals has been filed prior to January 1, 2022, and a decision on such petition remains pending, such petition for appeal shall be deemed granted and the clerk of the Court of Appeals shall certify the granting of such petition to the trial court and all counsel. Such case shall be considered mature for purposes of further proceedings from the date of such certificate.”

Acts
2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 489, cl. 6 provides: “That the provisions of this act amending
§

17.1-400

of the Code of Virginia shall become effective in due course and that the remaining provisions of this act shall become effective on January 1, 2022.”

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendment by c. 889 added clause (iv) in subsection A and made a related change.

The 2013 amendments.

The 2013 amendment by c. 746 substituted “pursuant to Article 6.1 (§

18.2-307.1

et seq.) of Chapter 7 of Title 18.2” for “pursuant to subsection D of §

18.2-308

” at the end of clause (ii) in the first sentence of subsection A.

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendment by c. 809, in subsection A, inserted “or

53.1-133.04

” following “to §

53.1-40.1

.”

The 2021 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2021 amendments by Sp. Sess. I, cc. 344 and 345, effective July 1, 2021, are identical, and deleted “except where a sentence of death has been Imposed” from the end of clause (i) of subsection A; and deleted “from a conviction in which a sentence of death is imposed” following “Supreme Court” in the first sentence of subsection B; and made stylistic changes.

The 2021 amendment by Sp. Sess. I, c. 489, effective January 1, 2022, in subsection A, deleted “present a petition for” following “Any aggrieved party may” and deleted clauses (ii)-(iv) in the first sentence, which read: “(ii) any final decision of a circuit court on an application for a concealed weapons permit pursuant to Article 6.1 (§

18.2-307.1

et seq.) of Chapter 7 of Title 18.2, (iii) any final order of a circuit court involving involuntary treatment of prisoners pursuant to §

53.1-40.1

or

53.1-133.04

, or (iv) any final order for declaratory or injunctive relief under §

57-2.02

”; and made a stylistic change.

Law Review.

For 1985 survey of Virginia civil procedure and practice, see 19 U. Rich. L. Rev. (1985).

For an article, “Final and Interlocutory Appeals in Virginia,” see 8 Geo. Mason L. Rev. 337 (1999).

For article surveying developments in criminal law and procedure in Virginia from July 2001 to September 2002, see 37 U. Rich. L. Rev. 45 (2002).

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

1B M.J. Appeal and Error, §§ 15, 20.1, 56; 9A M.J. Habeas Corpus, §§ 18, 25; 10A M.J. Injunctions, § 72; 12B M.J. Mandamus, § 24.

§ 17.1-407.
Procedures on appeal.

The notice of appeal in all cases within the jurisdiction of the court shall be filed with the clerk of the trial court or the clerk of the Virginia Workers’ Compensation Commission, as appropriate, and a copy of such notice shall be mailed or delivered to all opposing counsel and parties not represented by counsel, to the clerk of the Court of Appeals, and to the Attorney General in criminal cases. The clerk shall endorse thereon the day and year he received it.

Appeals pursuant to §

17.1-405

and subsection A of §

17.1-406

, other than petitions for appeal by the Commonwealth in criminal cases, are appeals of right. The clerk of the Court of Appeals shall refer each case for which a notice of appeal has been filed to a panel of the court as the court may direct.

Each petition for appeal by the Commonwealth in a criminal case shall be referred to one or more judges of the Court of Appeals as the court shall direct. A judge to whom the petition is referred may grant the petition on the basis of the record without the necessity of oral argument. The clerk shall refer each appeal for which a petition has been granted to a panel of the court as the court shall direct.

Before a petition for appeal by the Commonwealth is denied, counsel for the Commonwealth shall be entitled to state orally before a panel of the court the reasons why its appeal should be granted. If all of the judges of the panel to whom the petition is referred are of the opinion that the petition ought not be granted, the order denying the appeal shall state the reasons for the denial. Thereafter, no other petition in the matter shall be entertained in the Court of Appeals.

History.

1984, c. 701, § 17-116.05:2; 1988, cc. 71, 479; 1998, c. 872; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 489.

Editor’s note.

Acts
2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 489, cl. 3 provides: “That any case for which a notice of appeal to the Supreme Court has been filed prior to January 1, 2022, shall continue in the Supreme Court of Virginia and shall not be affected by the provisions of this act.”

Acts
2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 489, cl. 4 provides: “That any case for which a petition for appeal in a criminal case to the Court of Appeals has been filed prior to January 1, 2022, and a decision on such petition remains pending, such petition for appeal shall be deemed granted and the clerk of the Court of Appeals shall certify the granting of such petition to the trial court and all counsel. Such case shall be considered mature for purposes of further proceedings from the date of such certificate.”

Acts
2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 489, cl. 6 provides: “That the provisions of this act amending
§

17.1-400

of the Code of Virginia shall become effective in due course and that the remaining provisions of this act shall become effective on January 1, 2022.”

The 2021 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2021 amendment by Sp. Sess. I, c. 489, effective January 1, 2022, inserted “and to the Attorney General in criminal cases” in subsection A; in subsection B, inserted “and subsection A of §

17.1-406

, other than petitions for appeal by the Commonwealth in criminal cases” and deleted “other than appeals in criminal cases” following “has been filed”; inserted “by the Commonwealth” in subsection C; in subsection D, substituted “Before a petition for appeal by the Commonwealth is denied, counsel for the Commonwealth” for “If the judge to whom a petition is initially referred does not grant the appeal, counsel for the petitioner” and made a gender-neutral change; and made a stylistic change.

Law Review.

For 1985 survey of Virginia civil procedure and practice, see 19 U. Rich. L. Rev. (1985).